Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.280

Sampling and examination of pesticides or devices—Procedure when criminal proceedings contemplated.

The sampling and examination of pesticides or devices shall be made under the direction of the director for the purpose of determining whether or not they comply with the requirements of this chapter. The director is authorized, upon presentation of proper identification, to enter any distributor's premises, including any vehicle of transport, at all reasonable times in order to have access to pesticides or devices. If it appears from such examination that a pesticide or device fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, and the director contemplates instituting criminal proceedings against any person, the director shall cause notice to be given to such person. Any person so notified shall be given an opportunity to present his or her views, either orally or in writing, with regard to the contemplated proceedings. If thereafter in the opinion of the director it appears that the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter have been violated by such person, the director shall refer a copy of the results of the analysis or the examination of such pesticide or device to the prosecuting attorney for the county in which the violation occurred.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6067; 1989 c 380 s 24; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 28.]